hu: Analóg szintetizátor billentyűzetének konfigurációja: 25 billentyűs; 32 billentyűs; 37 billentyűs; 49 billentyűs; 61 billentyűs; 73 billentyűs; 76 billentyűs; 88 billentyűs; Billentyűk nélkül (asztali/modul); Egyéb
da: Konfiguration af analog synthesizer-taster: 25 tangenter; 32 tangenter; 37 tangenter; 49 tangenter; 61 tangenter; 73 tangenter; 76 tangenter; 88 tangenter; Ingen tangenter (desktop/modul); Andet
ro-RO: Configurația claviaturii sintetizatorului analogic: 25 de clape; 32 de clape; 37 de clape; 49 de clape; 61 de clape; 73 de clape; 76 de clape; 88 de clape; Fără clape (desktop/modul); Altele
th: การจัดวางคีย์เบดของซินธิไซเซอร์แบบอนาล็อก: 25 คีย์; 32 คีย์; 37 คีย์; 49 คีย์; 61 คีย์; 73 คีย์; 76 คีย์; 88 คีย์; ไม่มีคีย์ (เดสก์ท็อป/โมดูล); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Konfiguracija klavijature analognog sintesajzera: 25 tipki; 32 tipke; 37 tipki; 49 tipki; 61 tipka; 73 tipke; 76 tipki; 88 tipki; Bez tipki (stolno računalo / modul); Ostalo
bg-BG: Конфигурация на клавиатурата на аналогов синтезатор: 25 клавиша; 32 клавиша; 37 клавиша; 49 клавиша; 61 клавиша; 73 клавиша; 76 клавиша; 88 клавиша; Без клавиши (настолен/модул); Друго
tr: Analog sentezleyici klavye konfigürasyonu: 25 tuş; 32 tuş; 37 tuş; 49 tuş; 61 tuş; 73 tuş; 76 tuş; 88 tuş; Tuşsuz (masaüstü/modül); Diğer
it: Configurazione della tastiera del sintetizzatore analogico: 25 tasti; 32 tasti; 37 tasti; 49 tasti; 61 tasti; 73 tasti; 76 tasti; 88 tasti; Senza tasti (desktop/modulo); Altro
de: Konfiguration der Tastatur eines analogen Synthesizers: 25 Tasten; 32 Tasten; 37 Tasten; 49 Tasten; 61 Tasten; 73 Tasten; 76 Tasten; 88 Tasten; Ohne Tasten (Desktop/Modul); Sonstige
sl-SI: Konfiguracija tipkovnice analognega sintetizatorja: 25 tipk; 32 tipk; 37 tipk; 49 tipk; 61 tipk; 73 tipk; 76 tipk; 88 tipk; Brez tipk (namizni modul); Drugo
nl: Toetsenbordconfiguratie analoge synthesizer: 25 toetsen; 32 toetsen; 37 toetsen; 49 toetsen; 61 toetsen; 73 toetsen; 76 toetsen; 88 toetsen; Geen toetsen (desktop/module); Overig
ja: アナログシンセサイザーの鍵盤構造: 25鍵; 32鍵; 37鍵; 49鍵; 61鍵; 73鍵; 76鍵; 88鍵; 鍵盤なし (デスクトップ/モジュール); その他
sk-SK: Konfigurácia kláves analógového syntetizátora: 25 klávesov; 32 klávesov; 37 klávesov; 49 klávesov; 61 klávesov; 73 klávesov; 76 klávesov; 88 klávesov; Bez klávesov (stolný/modul); Iná
cs: Konfigurace kláves analogového syntezátoru: 25 kláves; 32 kláves; 37 kláves; 49 kláves; 61 kláves; 73 kláves; 76 kláves; 88 kláves; Bez kláves (stolní/modul); Jiné
zh-CN: 模拟合成器键盘配置: 25 键; 32 键; 37 键; 49 键; 61 键; 73 键; 76 键; 88 键; 无按键（桌面版/模块版）; 其他
nb: Konfigurasjon av analog synthesizer-tastbord: 25 tangenter; 32 tangenter; 37 tangenter; 49 tangenter; 61 tangenter; 73 tangenter; 76 tangenter; 88 tangenter; Ingen tangenter (skrivebord/modul); Annet
sv: Konfiguration av analog synttangenter: 25 tangenter; 32 tangenter; 37 tangenter; 49 tangenter; 61 tangenter; 73 tangenter; 76 tangenter; 88 tangenter; Inga tangenter (skrivbord/modul); Annan
pt-PT: Configuração do teclado do sintetizador analógico: 25 teclas; 32 teclas; 37 teclas; 49 teclas; 61 teclas; 73 teclas; 76 teclas; 88 teclas; Sem teclas (desktop/módulo); Outro
pl: Konfiguracja klawiatury syntezatora analogowego: 25 klawiszy; 32 klawisze; 37 klawiszy; 49 klawiszy; 61 klawiszy; 73 klawisze; 76 klawiszy; 88 klawiszy; Brak klawiszy (desktop/moduł); Inne
en: Analog synthesizer keybed configuration: 25-key; 32-key; 37-key; 49-key; 61-key; 73-key; 76-key; 88-key; No keys (desktop/module); Other
zh-TW: 模擬合成器鍵盤配置: 25 鍵; 32 鍵; 37 鍵; 49 鍵; 61 鍵; 73 鍵; 76 鍵; 88 鍵; 無琴鍵 (桌上型/音源模組); 其他
ko: 아날로그 신디사이저 건반 구성: 25건반; 32건반; 37건반; 49건반; 61건반; 73건반; 76건반; 88건반; 건반 없음(데스크톱/모듈); 기타
es: Configuración del teclado del sintetizador analógico: 25 teclas; 32 teclas; 37 teclas; 49 teclas; 61 teclas; 73 teclas; 76 teclas; 88 teclas; Sin teclas (escritorio/módulo); Otro
lt-LT: Analoginio sintezatoriaus klaviatūros konfigūracija: 25 klavišų; 32 klavišų; 37 klavišų; 49 klavišų; 61 klavišo; 73 klavišų; 76 klavišų; 88 klavišų; Be klavišų (stalinis / modulinis); Kita
ru: Конфигурация клавиатуры аналогового синтезатора: 25 клавиш; 32 клавиши; 37 клавиш; 49 клавиш; 61 клавиша; 73 клавиши; 76 клавиш; 88 клавиш; Без клавиш (десктоп/модуль); Другое
pt-BR: Configuração do teclado do sintetizador analógico: 25 teclas; 32 teclas; 37 teclas; 49 teclas; 61 teclas; 73 teclas; 76 teclas; 88 teclas; Sem teclas (desktop/módulo); Outro
el: Διαμόρφωση πλήκτρων αναλογικού συνθεσάιζερ: 25 πλήκτρων; 32 πλήκτρων; 37 πλήκτρων; 49 πλήκτρων; 61 πλήκτρων; 73 πλήκτρων; 76 πλήκτρων; 88 πλήκτρων; Χωρίς πλήκτρα (επιτραπέζιο/module); Άλλο
fi: Analogisen syntetisaattorin koskettimiston kokoonpano: 25-koskettiminen; 32-koskettiminen; 37-koskettiminen; 49-koskettiminen; 61-koskettiminen; 73-koskettiminen; 76-koskettiminen; 88-koskettiminen; Ei koskettimia (pöytäkone/moduuli); Muu
vi: Cấu hình bàn phím của bộ tổng hợp âm thanh tương tự: 25 phím; 32 phím; 37 phím; 49 phím; 61 phím; 73 phím; 76 phím; 88 phím; Không phím (để bàn/mô-đun); Khác
fr: Configuration du clavier du synthétiseur analogique: 25 touches; 32 touches; 37 touches; 49 touches; 61 touches; 73 touches; 76 touches; 88 touches; Sans touches (bureau/module); Autre